Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-277
County supervisors; quorum.

A majority of all the supervisors
elected in any county shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business,
and all questions which shall arise at meetings shall be determined by the
votes of a majority of the supervisors present, except in cases otherwise
provided for.

Laws 1879, § 68, p. 373;

R.S.1913, § 1069;

C.S.1922, § 971;

C.S.1929, § 26-285;

R.S.1943, § 23-277;

Laws 2014, LB937, § 1.

A majority of members present at meeting may change township boundaries. Township of Inavale v. Bailey, 35 Neb. 453, 53 N.W. 465 (1892).

If two-thirds of board are present, impeachment proceedings may be heard. State ex rel. Castor v. Board of Supervisors of Saline County, 18 Neb. 422, 25 N.W. 587 (1885).